North Carolina, session 2025, SB922.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the City of Winston-Salem for
planning and costs to support operations and cultural programming associated with the
International Black Theatre Festival scheduled to be held in the City in July and August of 2026.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S922-v-1*